Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for  a six-year period beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for pay-
ment of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the state agencies listed,
for the acquisition of land and the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing,
furnishing and equipping of buildings and facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
(a) Mission Critical Facility
Yellow Lot Building .................. $ 4,579,431
(b) Department of Human
Services Building Upgrades....... $ 3,743,000
(c) Employment Building
Upgrades................................... $ 6,236,000
(d) Electrical Upgrades and
Replacements............................ $ 3,890,000
(e) Capitol Mall Parking
Structure Study and
Upgrades................................... $ 2,926,000
(f) Planning.................................... $ 500,000
(g) Boiler and Heating
Upgrades................................... $ 1,234,000
(h) Portland Crime Lab
Upgrade..................................... $ 1,162,000
(i) Parking Lot Upgrades ............... $ 3,500,000
(j) Portland State Office
Building Renovation.................. $ 13,146,000
(k) State Data Center
Power Upgrades ........................ $ 11,000,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 1
(L) Elected Official Staff
Relocation ................................. $ 6,300,000
(2) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Regional Armory
Emergency Enhancement ......... $ 8,534,400
(b) Grants Pass Armory Service
Life Extension ........................... $ 3,270,356
(c) Future Readiness Center
Sites .......................................... $ 1,730,000
(3) Oregon Youth Authority:
(a) Capital Improvements............... $ 17,168,249
(b) MacLaren 7 West Cottages
Renovation................................ $ 21,177,200
(c) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements ........................... $ 10,973,465
(4) Department of Corrections:
(a) Capital Improvements and
Renewal..................................... $ 26,293,534
(b) Technology Infrastructure ........ $ 12,200,000
(5) Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
(a) Roseburg Veterans’ Home ........ $ 10,500,000
(b) Oregon Veterans’ Home
Capital Improvements............... $ 2,450,000
(6) Department of Transportation,
Toledo Maintenance
Station Phase 1 ......................... $ 6,300,000
(7) Oregon Department of Aviation:
(a) Bandon Electrical, Gate,
Obstruction Removal ................ $ 192,500
(b) McDermitt State Airport
Runway and Taxi ...................... $ 120,000
(c) Chiloquin Taxi and Fencing ...... $ 110,000
(d) Lebanon Taxi and Apron
Rehabilitation............................ $ 110,000
(8) State Department of Fish and
Wildlife, Deferred Maintenance $ 10,000,000
(9) State Forestry Department,
Toledo Facility Replacement ..... $ 3,832,965
(10) Housing and Community
Services Department,
Family Affordable Housing ....... $ 80,000,000
(11) Department of
Education, Oregon School
for the Deaf Facility
Improvements ........................... $ 4,297,558
(12) Legislative Administration
Committee, Capitol Accessibility
Maintenance and Safety ............ $ 13,720,642
(13) Oregon Judicial Department:
(a) Multnomah County Courthouse
Furnishings and Equipment ...... $ 8,900,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 2
(b) Oregon Supreme Court
Building Renovation.................. $ 6,000,000
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits  for the
expenditure of federal funds collected or received by the Oregon Department of Aviation, for
the acquisition of land  and the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing, fur-
nishing and equipping of buildings and facilities:
(1) Bandon Electrical, Gate,
Obstruction Removal ................ $ 1,732,500
(2) McDermitt State Airport
Runway and Taxi ...................... $ 1,080,000
(3) Chiloquin Taxi and Fencing ...... $ 990,000
(4) Lebanon Taxi and Apron
Rehabilitation............................ $ 990,000
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$330,825,000 is established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum  limit
for payment of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts and reimbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in this section, collected or received by the Higher  Education
Coordinating Commission, for expenditures of proceeds from state bonds issued for the  ben-
efit of a public university, pursuant to agreements  between the commission and a public
university.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$101,397,241 is established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum  limit
for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts and reimbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds  not described in this section, collected or received by the Higher Education
Coordinating Commission,  for expenditures of proceeds from state bonds issued for the ben-
efit of a community college, pursuant to agreements between the  commission and a com-
munity college.
SECTION 5. The project  approvals and expenditure limitations in sections 1, 2, 3 and 4
of this 2017 Act and the expenditure limitations established by  the Emergency Board during
the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for capital construction  or acquistion projects, expire
on June 30, 2023, unless otherwise noted.
SECTION 6. The expiration dates of the project approvals and expenditure  limitations
authorized by the Legislative Assembly for the following projects  are extended to the fol-
lowing dates:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
(a) Department of Environmental
Quality and Public Health
Laboratory Roof Replacement
(other funds) (May 25, 2016,
Emergency Board,
Item No. 62) .............................. June 30, 2018
(b) Capital and Tenant Improvements
for 550 Building (other funds)
(May 25, 2016, Emergency
Board, Item No. 62) .................. June 30, 2018
(2) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission:
(a) Lane Community College
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 3
Science, Technology, Engineering
and Math Classrooms and Labs
(other funds) (section 11 (8),
chapter 79, Oregon Laws 2012,
as amended by section 12,
chapter 66, Oregon Laws 2016) . June 30, 2018
(b) Rogue Community College
Manufacturing and Fabrication
Flex Lab (other funds)
(section 11 (13), chapter 79,
Oregon Laws 2012, as amended
by section 12, chapter 66,
Oregon Laws 2016) .................... June 30, 2018
(c) Umpqua Community College
Roseburg Regional Health
Occupations Training Center
(other funds) (section 7 (9),
chapter 904, Oregon Laws 2009,
and section 7, chapter 727,
Oregon Laws 2013) .................... June 30, 2018
(d) Portland Community College
Health Professions Center
(other funds) (section 6 (11),
chapter 727, Oregon Laws
2013).......................................... June 30, 2021
(3) State Department of
Fish and Wildlife, Ruby
Pipeline (other funds)
(section 1 (4)(a), chapter 615,
Oregon Laws 2011) .................... June 30, 2019
(4) Oregon Military Department:
(a) The Dalles Readiness Center
(other funds) (section 1 (3)(a),
chapter 615, Oregon Laws
2011).......................................... June 30, 2018
(b) The Dalles Readiness Center
(federal funds) (section 2 (2),
chapter 615, Oregon Laws
2011).......................................... June 30, 2018
(5) Department of Transportation:
(a) Salem Baggage Depot
Renovations (other funds)
(May 30, 2014, Emergency
Board, Item No. 41) .................. June 30, 2019
(b) Salem Baggage Depot
Renovations (federal funds)
(May 30, 2014, Emergency
Board, Item No. 41) .................. June 30, 2019
SECTION 7.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, and in lieu of the
limitation on expenditures established at the May  2014 Emergency Board meeting (Item No.
41), the amount of $373,324 is established  for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2013, as the
maximum limit for payment of expenses for renovating the Salem Baggage Depot  from fees,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 4
moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Transportation.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, and in lieu of the
limitation on expenditures established at the May  2014 Emergency Board meeting (Item No.
41), the amount of $2,415,824 is established for a six-year period beginning July  1, 2013, as the
maximum limit for payment of expenses for renovating the Salem Baggage Depot  from fed-
eral funds collected or received by the Department of Transportation.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, and in lieu  of the
limitation on expenditures established at the May  2016 Emergency Board meeting (Item No.
62), the amount of $5,400,000 is established for a six-year period beginning July  1, 2015, as the
maximum limit for payment of expenses for capital and tenant improvements at the 550
Building from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but exclud-
ing lottery funds and federal funds,  collected or received by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services.
SECTION 10.
 Section 1, chapter  808, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by section 1, chapter 67,
Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the following amounts are estab-
lished for a six-year period  beginning July 1, 2015, as the maximum limits for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery funds
and federal funds, collected or received by the state agencies listed, for the acquisition of  land and
the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing, furnishing and equipping of buildings  and
facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
(a) North Campus Demolition
and Site Improvement ...................... $ 8,300,000
(b) Department of Environmental
Quality Public Health Lab
Emergency Generator Upgrade ..... $ 2,926,140
(c) Employment Building Upgrades .... $ 2,217,398
(d) Electrical Upgrades/
Replacements ......................................$ 2,089,795
(e) Department of Human
Services Building, Cooling
Tower Replacement .......................... $ 1,701,702
(f) Executive Building
Elevator Upgrades ............................ $ 875,461
(g) Executive Building Fire
Sprinkler..............................................$ 89,322
(h) Planning ..............................................$ 350,000
(i) Capital Investments/
Acquisitions ........................................$ 17,000,000
(j) Executive Building Central
Stairway Upgrade ............................. $ 377,443
(k) Oregon State Fair
Capital Repairs and
Deferred Maintenance ..................... $ 2,500,000
(2) Oregon Military Department:
(a) New Headquarters
Facilities ..............................................$  6,700,000
(b) Youth Challenge Armory ................ $ 4,977,000
(c) Planning and Predesign ................... $ 136,281
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 5
(d) Oregon Military Museum ................ $ 725,963
(e) Regional Training Institute ............ $ 11,500,000
(3) Oregon Youth Authority:
(a) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements ..................................... $ 9,880,000
(b) MacLaren Facility
Improvements ..................................... $ 30,934,000
(c) CCTV Cameras .................................. $ 1,147,435
(d) Deferred Maintenance
and Capital Improvements .............. $ 7,058,000
(4) Department of Corrections,
Deferred Maintenance ..................... $ 14,220,432
(5) Housing and Community
Services Department,
Family Affordable Housing ............. $ 40,000,000
(6) Department of Transportation:
(a) South Coast Maintenance
Station .................................................$ 4,500,000
(b) Meacham Maintenance
Station .................................................$ 7,500,000
(c) Maintenance Facilities
Colocation ...........................................$ 1
(d) Highway Improvement
Projects ................................................$ 35,000,000
(7) Oregon Department of Aviation:
(a) Condon State Airport,
Renovations ........................................$ 226,111
(b) McDermitt State Airport,
Rehabilitation ..................................... $ 201,667
(c) Aurora State Airport, Apron/
Taxiway and Taxilane Project ....... $ 130,000
(8) Department of Veterans’
Affairs, The Dalles Veterans’
[Home Renovation .............................. $ 1,510,547]
Home Renovation...................... $ 2,475,976
(9) State Department of Fish and
Wildlife:
(a) Cedar Creek Hatchery and Fish
Passage Improvements ..................... $ 2,000,000
(b) Lower Deschutes River Ranch
Acquisition ..........................................$ 227,269
(10) Legislative Administration Committee,
State Capitol Capital Repairs
and Improvements ............................. $ 30,000,000
SECTION 11.
 Section 2, chapter 808, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by  section 1, chapter 67,
Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  following amounts are estab-
lished for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2015, as the maximum limits for  the expenditure of
federal funds collected or received by the state agencies listed, for the acquisition of land and the
acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing, furnishing and equipping  of buildings and
facilities:
(1) Oregon Military Department:
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 6
(a) Planning and Predesign ................... $ 140,770
(b) New Headquarters
Facilities ..............................................$ 18,463,000
(c) Medford Armory ................................ $ 2,884,448
(d) Baker City Readiness Center ......... $ 750,000
(e) Sharff Hall/Maison Armory ............ $ 2,051,033
(2) State Department of Fish
and Wildlife:
(a) Willamette Falls Fishway
Repair ..................................................$ 1,000,000
(b) Lower Deschutes River
Ranch Acquisition ............................. $ 1,323,750
(c) Clackamas Hatchery Intake
System..................................................$ 450,000
(3) Oregon Department of Aviation:
(a) Condon State Airport,
Renovations ........................................$ 2,035,000
(b) McDermitt State Airport,
Rehabilitation ..................................... $ 1,815,000
(c) Aurora State Airport, Apron/
Taxiway and Taxilane Project ....... $ 1,170,000
(4) Department of Veterans’
Affairs, The Dalles Veterans’
[Home Renovation .............................. $ 2,805,303]
Home Renovation...................... $ 3,302,891
SECTION 12. The Legislative Assembly approves  the proposal of the Oregon Military
Department, submitted in accordance with ORS 396.515 (4), for the sale of  the Burns Armory
and 40 acres of land in La Grande, Oregon.
SECTION 13.  This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2017.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 7
Passed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 8